xinruyan/swahili2.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+N +V
+Sg +Pl
+1SgS +2SgS +3SgS +1PlS +3PlS
+1SgO +2SgO +3SgO +1PlO +3PlO
+Fut +Pres +Perf +Past

LEXICON Root
+N:0 Noun;
+V:0 Verb;

LEXICON Noun
+Sg:u Add;
+Sg:w Add;
+Pl:m Add;
+Pl:ŋ Add;
+Pl:n Add;
+Pl:ɲ Add;
+Pl:0 Add;

LEXICON Verb
+3SgS:a Aspect;
+1SgS:ni Aspect;
+2SgS:u Aspect;
+1PlS:tʰu Aspect;
+3PlS:wa Aspect;

LEXICON Aspect
+Fut:ta	Object;
+Pres:na Object;
+Perf:me Object;
+Past:li Object;

LEXICON Object
+1SgO:ni Add;
+2SgO:ku Add;
+3SgO:m Add;
+1PlO:tu Add;
+3PlO:wa Add;

LEXICON Add
+:0 Stem;

LEXICON Stem
bao #;
bawa #;
devu #;
gwe #;
wati #;
wanda #;
wiŋgu #;
limi #;
paŋga #;
pindi #;
tambi #;
tepe #;
kuta #;
kuni #;
kut⁀ʃa #;
fuŋguo #;
fagio #;
fizi #;
vumbi #;
siku #;
ʃaŋga #;
akati #;
avu #;
ajo #;
embe #;
imbo #;
penda #;
sumbua #;
piga #;
lipa #;
